apertium-kaa.kaa.lexc
LEXICON CASE-NONOM

! This continuation lexicon is a copy of the normal case lexicon,
! only it does not include nominative
!   1<num><nom> = 1, 1<num><acc> = 1-{N}{I}

%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ń CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n # ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} # ;
%<ins%>:%>%{M%}enen CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON CASE-ETC-NONOM

CASE-NONOM ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM

POSSESSIVES ;
CASE-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON SUBST-NONOM

FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM ;

LEXICON SQRD
! This lexicon includes common ways of writing squared, cubed etc.

²%<num%>:2 # ;  ! Dir/LR
³%<num%>:3 # ;  ! Dir/LR
²%<num%>:² # ;
³%<num%>:³ # ;
%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>:%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

%<num%>%<ord%>:%-%{I%}nsh%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-%{I%}nsh%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%-%{I%}nsh%{I%} SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%-sh%{I%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-sh%{I%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%-sh%{I%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>:%-%{A%}w # ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<nom%>:%-%{A%}w # ;
%<num%>%<coll%>:%-%{A%}w SUBST-NONOM ;

%<num%>%<percent%>:%% # ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%% # ;

%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{а%}%{з%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{а%}%{з%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{э%}%{с%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

°С%<num%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{а%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{а%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{а%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

С%<num%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>:°%{а%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>:°%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

! Measurement units

km:km SQRD ;
mm:mm SQRD ;
sm:sm SQRD ;
m:m SQRD ;

LEXICON LASTDIGIT

1:1%{э%}%{й%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "бір"
2:2%{э%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "екі"
3:3%{э%}%{с%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "үш"
4:4%{э%}%{с%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "төрт"
5:5%{э%}%{с%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "бес"
6:6%{а%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "алты"
7:7%{э%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "жеті"
8:8%{э%}%{з%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "сегіз"
9:9%{а%}%{з%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "тоғыз"

LEXICON LASTDIGIT-REST

1%0:1%0%{а%}%{н%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "он"
2%0:2%0%{а%}            NUM-DIGIT ; ! "қырық"
3%0:3%0%{а%}%{з%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "отыз"
4%0:4%0%{а%}%{с%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "қырық"
5%0:5%0%{э%}%{й%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "елу"
6%0:6%0%{а%}%{с%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "алпыс"
7%0:7%0%{э%}%{с%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "жетпіс"
8%0:8%0%{э%}%{н%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "сексен"
9%0:9%0%{а%}%{н%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "тоқсан"

LEXICON POWERS
%0%0:%0%0%{э%}%{з%}     NUM-DIGIT ; ! "жүз"
%0%0%0:%0%0%0%{а%}%{н%} NUM-DIGIT ; ! "мың"

LEXICON LOOP

%,:%, DIGITLEX ;
%.:%. DIGITLEX ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%,:%, POWERS ;
%.:%. POWERS ;
      DIGITLEX ;
      LASTDIGIT ;
      LASTDIGIT-REST ;
      POWERS ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;

!==============================================================================!
!          N U M E R A L     L E X I C O N     E N D S     H E R E
!==============================================================================!


!==============================================================================!
! CLITICS
!==============================================================================!

! First, let's list all the clitics we have

LEXICON CLIT-EMPH

%+shı%<emph%>:%>sh%{I%} # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-QST-MA

%+ma%<qst%>:%>% %{M%}%{A%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%+ma%<qst%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} # ;

LEXICON CLIT-QST

CLIT-QST-MA ;
%+meken%<qst%>:% %{M%}eken # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-MOD

!%+ǵoy%<mod_ass%>:% %{G%}oy # ;  ! FIXME: CHECK
%+ǵo%<mod%>:ǵo # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-GHANA-ETC

%+%-aq%<postadv%>:%-aq # ; ! ""
%+ǵana%<postadv%>:% %{G%}ana # ; ! ""
%+da%<cnjcoo%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ; ! ""
!%+de%<cnjcoo%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ; ! ""
%+da%<postadv%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ; ! "also"
%+menen%<cnjcoo%>:% %{M%}enen # ; ! "and"
# ;

! Now, let's group them depending on what they can attach to

LEXICON COMMON-CLITICS

CLIT-QST ;
CLIT-MOD ;
CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON CLIT

# ; 

LEXICON CLITICS-NO-COP 

CLIT-QST ;
CLIT-MOD ;
CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON CLIT-COP

%+e%<cop%>%<aor%>: V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON CLITICS-INCL-COP         ! Can appear only after nominals
                                 ! (and only after some cases).
CLITICS-NO-COP ;
CLIT-COP ;

LEXICON CASES-OBL

%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ń COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n CLIT-COP ;

LEXICON CASES-COMMON

%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ń COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
!%<ins%>:%>% %{M%}enen COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<ins%>:%>%{M%}enen COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<ins%>:%>%{M%}en COMMON-CLITICS ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON CASES

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;


LEXICON POSSESSIVES

!CASES-ETC ;
%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}m CASES-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ń CASES-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ń%{I%}z CASES-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}m%{I%}z CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ńl%{A%}r CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ń%{I%}zl%{A%}r CASES-ETC ;


LEXICON ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: CASES ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r CASES ;

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<px%>:%>%{N%}iki%{n%} CASES ;
%<px%>%<pl%>:%>%{N%}iki%>l%{A%}r CASES ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ; 
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}y CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! COMMON-CLITICS ;        

LEXICON CASES-ETC

CASES ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION

%+sız%<post%>:%>s%{I%}z CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON LI-POSTPOSITION

%+lı%<post%>:%>%{l%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PLURAL

%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

PLURAL ;
CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;
ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
LI-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSSESSIVES ;
CASES-ETC ;
!ABESS ;

LEXICON SUBST

N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON N1-ABBR

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>:%- POSSESSIVES ;
%<n%>:%- CASES-ETC ;
%<n%>: CASES-ETC ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON

:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;       ! for stuff like "біздің aуa рaйымыз" and even "oның aуa рaйы",
                  ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis


LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX ! consider "N2" for the name
                      ! equiv of kir:LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<n%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; ! (e.g. чик сaкчылaры=пoгрaничники)
                                                      !  FIXME CHECK: Is {s} needed here ?

LEXICON N3
! Singularia tantum

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N5

: N1 ;

 LEXICON Nouns
xoldey:xoldey N5 ; ! ""
sshet:sshet N5 ; ! ""
kumuliyar:kumuliyar N5 ; ! ""
emitent:emitent N5 ; ! ""
diskont:diskont N5 ; ! ""
trast:trast N5 ; ! ""
kliring:kliring N5 ; ! ""
seyf:seyf N5 ; ! ""
shkaf:shkaf N5 ; ! ""
lombard:lombard N5 ; ! ""
girewxana:girewxana N5 ; ! ""
kartochka:kartochka N5 ; ! ""
inkassaciya:inkassaciya N5 ; ! ""
inkasso:inkasso N5 ; ! ""
akkreditiv:akkreditiv N5 ; ! ""
manufaktura:manufaktura N5 ; ! ""
institut:institut N5 ; ! ""
jirobank:jirobank N5 ; ! ""
moneta:moneta N5 ; ! ""
veksel:veksel N5 ; ! ""
normativ:normativ N5 ; ! ""
perspektiva:perspektiva N5 ; ! ""
kapitalizm:kapitalizm N5 ; ! ""
obligaciya:obligaciya N5 ; ! ""
bazar:bazar N5 ; ! ""
paket:paket N5 ; ! ""
aktiv:aktiv N5 ; ! ""
kooperaciya:kooperaciya N5 ; ! ""
ǵáziynexana:ǵáziynexana N5 ; ! ""
qaznaxana:qaznaxana N5 ; ! ""
resurs:resurs N5 ; ! ""
depozit:depozit N5 ; ! ""
filial:filial N5 ; ! ""
banknot:banknot N5 ; ! ""
internet:internet N5 ; ! "" 
scenariyshi:scenariyshi N5 ; ! ""
scenariy:scenariy N5 ; ! ""
bank:bank N5 ; ! ""
injener:injener N5 ; ! ""
aktiv:aktiv N5 ; ! ""
Budda:budda N3 ; ! ""
Buddizm:Buddizm N5 ; ! ""
dúnya% júz:dúnya% júz  N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "world"
dúnya% júzi:dúnya% júz N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "world"
hawa% rayı:hawa% ray N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
imperialist:imperialis N5 ; ! "imperialist" ! Dir/LR
imperialist:imperialist N5 ; ! "imperialist"
lamait:lamait N5 ; ! ""
metabuddizm:metabuddizm N5 ; !
mln:mln N1-ABBR ; ! "million"
mlrd:mlrd%{а%}%{с%} N1-ABBR ; ! "billion"
km:km%{э%}%{з%} N1-ABBR ; ! "km"
mm:mm%{э%}%{з%} N1-ABBR ; ! "km"
